Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-345
Passenger car, defined.

Passenger car means a motor vehicle designed and used to carry ten passengers or less and not used for hire. Passenger car may include a sport utility vehicle.

Laws 2005, LB 274, § 45;

Laws 2007, LB286, § 28.